Spell/share/myspell/dicts/fo_FO.dic
akfar/KM
alkohol/KLM
almannamálaráð/KLM
alnótsamboð/KLM
alvalda/PQR
amboð/KLM
amtsráð/KLM
andlit/KLM
ansa/OR
ansingartilboð/KLM
arbeiðsamboð/KLM
arbeiðsferð/HIJL
arbeiðsgevaraumboð/KLM
arbeiðsmarknaðarráð/KLM
arbeiðsmálaráð/KLM
arbeiðsumhvørvisráð/KLM
argentinska/PQR
arvagjald/KM
avbjóðing/HJL
avgjald/KM
avhenda/OR
avmarkaða/PQR
avroð/L
avynnubarn/KM
aðalmál/KLM
aðalráð/KLM
aðalumboð/L
baka/OPQR
baldrutur/N
bana/OR
banna/OR
barnabarn/KM
barnaráð/KLM
baðikar/KM
beinur/N
belgiska/PQR
betra/OR
bilatilboð/KLM
bispagarða/PQR
bivan/HIJL
bjarga/OR
blaka/OR
blekk/KM
blíðligur/N
blóðigur/N
blóðugur/N
borgarafunda/PQR
borð/KLM
boða/OR
boðorð/KLM
breyð/L
brimgarða/PQR
brynjumannaborð/KM
brúkararáð/KLM
brúksráð/KLM
brúktbilatilboð/KLM
brúsirúm/KLM
bygdaráð/KLM
byggimál/KLM
byrja/OR
bíta/PQR
bókasavnsráð/KLM
bólkaferð/HIJL
bøna/OR
búskaparamboð/KM
búskaparráð/KLM
búskaparstýringaramboð/KLM
býarskipanardeild/HIJL
býráðsfunda/PQR
býtisbarn/KM
dagsferð/HIJL
deilda/PQR
djór/L
djúp/KM
djúpur/N
drasl/KM
drepa/PQR
dálkaða/PQR
dámligur/N
dáturáð/KLM
dópsboð/KLM
dýrur/N
eftirlit/KM
eftirútbúgvingartilboð/KLM
egna/OR
einaferð/L
einasta/PQR
einstaklingaborð/KM
elskaða/PQR
enda/OR
evna/OR
evroparáð/KLM
evropeiska/PQR
eykafólk/KLM
eykatingfólk/KLM
eyskar/KM
eysturbygd/HIJL
familjumálaráð/KLM
fasta/OPQR
fata/OPQR
ferðslumálaráð/KLM
feskur/N
finna/PQR
fiskimálaráð/KM
fjølmiðlaráð/KLM
fjøtraða/PQR
flekkutur/N
flogferð/HIJL
flokka/OPQR
floksráð/KLM
flutningsamboð/KLM
flutningstilboð/KLM
fløkjaligur/N
fløta/PQR
flúgviforboð/KLM
fongsla/OR
foreldraráð/KLM
foreldraumboð/KLM
forrit/KLM
forsætismálaráð/KLM
forverk/KLM
fosturlát/KLM
framskriva/OR
frekur/N
fremmanda/PQR
friðarboð/KLM
frænda/PQR
frískur/N
frítíðartilboð/KLM
fundarboð/KLM
fundarforboð/KLM
fyndigur/N
fyndugur/N
fákunna/PQR
fátækur/N
fíggjarstýringsamboð/KM
fólkaflyting/HJL
fólkatingsumboð/KLM
følna/OR
føra/PQR
førda/PQR
generella/PQR
gentubarn/KM
gera/PQR
gerandisamboð/KLM
giftarmál/KLM
girndarhuga/PQR
gita/PQR
gleðiboð/KLM
gløggur/N
grikska/PQR
grindaferð/HIJL
grundaða/PQR
grøna/PQR
grønlendska/PQR
gudsbarn/KM
gírigur/N
gírugur/N
góðkenda/PQR
góðsligur/N
haga/PQR
haka/OR
handilsferð/HIJL
handilsforboð/KLM
handla/OR
harma/OPQR
hatursherferð/HIJL
havgranskingarráð/KLM
havna/OR
hegnigur/N
heilaga/PQR
heildarætlan/HIJL
heim/KLM
heimferð/HIJL
heita/PQR
hendigur/N
hendugur/N
hevja/OR
hitta/PQR
hjalla/PQR
hjól/KLM
huga/OPQR
hugmóðiga/PQR
hugnaligur/N
hungra/OR
hála/OPQR
hálendska/PQR
hálmtak/KLM
hálova/OR
hálsband/KLM
háða/OR
hægsta/PQR
hækkaða/PQR
hótta/OPQR
høgur/N
høsn/L
ikki-lima/PQR
illa/PQR
iðra/OR
jarnbreyt/HIJL
jarðfrøðiliga/PQR
javna/OPQR
játta/OPQR
kalla/OPQR
kappingarføra/PQR
kar/KM
kasta/OR
kenda/PQR
kistilslok/KLM
kitl/KLM
kjaftbein/KLM
kjósa/O
klaga/OPQR
kliniska/PQR
klovna/OR
klókur/N
knappaborð/KM
knortlutur/N
kola/OR
kolvetnisfunda/PQR
koma/PQR
kommunulæknaskipan/HIJL
kosta/OPQR
kravboð/KLM
kravda/PQR
kreppufunda/PQR
kunnigur/N
kunnugur/N
kvirra/PQR
kvøða/PQR
kúga/OR
kúgannarherferð/HJL
laga/OPQR
land/KM
landa/OPQR
leika/OPQR
leka/PQR
lesa/PQR
lesningsboð/KLM
lita/OPQR
liva/PQR
liðugur/N
ljómborð/KM
ljósur/N
ljóða/O
lokka/OR
lon/HIJL
lorkutur/N
lurta/OR
luta/OPQR
lyfta/PQR
lækka/OR
líka/PQR
líta/PQR
lív/KM
lívtøkniligur/N
ló/HIJL
lúka/PQR
lúta/OPQR
manna/OR
marka/PQR
mata/PQR
matvørudeild/HIJL
megna/OR
metta/OPQR
milda/PQR
millumgarða/PQR
minutt/IKM
miða/OR
mjølvutur/N
mjúkur/N
morðgírigur/N
morðgírugur/N
muna/PQR
mála/OR
málleysa/PQR
máta/OR
míga/PQR
móða/PQ
móðurráð/KLM
møguligur/N
neyðuga/PQR
neyðugur/N
nigeriska/PQR
niðurskriva/OR
níga/PQR
nógva/PQR
nýtsluatferð/HIJL
ofra/OR
onkabarn/KM
orka/OR
oyra/PQR
oyðslutur/N
pakistanska/PQR
partabræv/KLM
passa/OR
pinkubarn/KM
pjakutur/N
politiska/PQR
prestagarða/PQR
prædika/OPQR
prísráð/KLM
prógva/OR
prýðiligur/N
punkt/KLM
pílagrímsferð/IJL
regluliga/PQR
reinsa/OR
reinur/N
reisa/PQR
republikanska/PQR
rinda/OPQR
rita/OR
roknskaparreglugerð/HIJL
roksutur/N
rudda/OR
russiska/PQR
ráð/KLMz
rænda/PQR
rætta/OPQR
ræða/PQR
ræðuligur/N
ríkisfunda/PQR
ríkislóg/HIJL
rógva/PQR
røkta/OR
sakleysa/PQR
salva/OPQR
salvaða/PQR
sameinda/PQR
samfelag/KM
samráðingarferð/HIJL
samsvara/OR
samtykta/PQR
savna/OR
seinasta/PQR
sessa/PQR
setta/PQR
sita/PQR
sjálvur/N
sjúka/PQ
sjúkrahúsdeild/HIJL
sjúkur/N
skaka/OR
skattskylduga/PQR
skegghár/KLM
skeivur/N
skelka/OPQR
skelkaða/PQR
skinkla/OR
skip/KLM
skipaða/PQR
skipsráð/KLM
skora/OR
skriftlærda/PQR
skriva/OPQR
skrivligur/N
skrivstovuamboð/KLM
skundigur/N
skál/HIJL
skáp/KLM
skína/PQR
skúgva/OPQ
skúlaflyting/HJL
slíta/PQR
smurda/PQR
sniðfundigur/N
snúðigur/N
sorgarboð/KLM
spjadda/PQR
spæl/KLM
standa/PQR
starva/OR
stilla/OPQR
stokkutur/N
stovna/OPQR
stuttleika/OPQR
stuttligur/N
stuðlaða/PQR
stórbygd/HIJL
størra/OR
størsta/PQR
stýriamboð/KLM
svarta/PQR
synd/HIJL
syndra/OR
sátubarn/KM
sæla/PQR
søkka/PQR
tala/OPQR
tekniska/PQR
tilfarsútflýggjan/HIJL
tilskilaða/PQR
tollavgjald/KM
torna/OPQR
tosa/OR
treiska/PQR
trygdarráð/KLM
tríva/PQR
trøll/KLM
trúgva/PQz
tulka/OPQR
tungur/N
tvørgarða/PQR
tysta/PQR
támutur/N
tæna/OR
tænastuferð/HIJL
tómur/N
tøkniligur/N
tøla/PQR
túra/PQR
umhvørvismálaráð/KLM
umsita/PQR
umskriva/OR
umtókta/PQR
undirvísingarmálaráð/KLM
upprit/KLM
uppsparda/PQR
urtagarða/PQR
vanda/PQR
vandaferð/HIJL
vanhalga/OR
vanliga/PQR
vanligur/N
varigur/N
varugur/N
vaska/OR
veika/PQR
veldiga/PQR
veruliga/PQR
veva/QR
vikuskiftistilboð/KLM
vitigur/N
vitja/OR
vitjan/HIJL
vitugur/N
viða/PQR
vátur/N
vælsigna/OR
vælsignaða/PQR
vígda/PQR
vónleysur/N
vøggubarn/KM
ákærurit/KLM
álopsboð/KLM
ásetta/PQR
ástøðiligur/N
átrúnaðarliga/PQR
ávirka/OR
ætlan/HIJL
ævigur/N
ævugur/N
ímutur/N
ítróttarligur/N
øgiliga/PQR
økta/PQR
ørðugur/N
øvutur/N
úrslita/OR
